Hawaii statutes.
[O.] Mauna Kea Lands

[§304A-1901] Definitions. As used in
this subpart:

"Board of regents" means the board of
regents of the University of Hawaii.

"Fees" includes rents on leases of
Mauna Kea lands, moneys received for use of Mauna Kea lands, moneys
attributable to commercial activities on Mauna Kea lands, and moneys received
for the use of facilities and programs on Mauna Kea lands.

"Mauna Kea lands" means the lands
that the University of Hawaii is leasing from the board of land and natural
resources, including the Mauna Kea Science Reserve, Hale Pohaku, the connecting
roadway corridor between Hale Pohaku and the Mauna Kea Science Reserve, and any
other lands on Mauna Kea that the University of Hawaii leases or over which the
University of Hawaii acquires control or jurisdiction. [L 2009, c 132, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next